Utah statutes.
75-5-423.   Persons dealing with conservators -- Protection.
A person who in good faith either assists a conservator or deals with him for
value in any transaction, other than those requiring a court order as provided
in Section 75-5-408, is protected as if the conservator properly exercised the
power. The fact that a person knowingly deals with a conservator does not
alone require the person to inquire into the existence of a power or the
propriety of its exercise, except that restrictions on powers of conservators
which are endorsed on letters as provided in Section 75-5-426 are effective as
to third persons. A person is not bound to see to the proper application of
estate assets paid or delivered to a conservator. The protection here
expressed extends to instances in which some procedural irregularity or
jurisdictional defect occurred in proceedings leading to the issuance of
letters. The protection here expressed is not by substitution for that
provided by comparable provisions of the laws relating to commercial
transactions and laws simplifying transfers of securities by fiduciaries.
